District of Columbia statutes.
22-3020.54

Penalties.

(a)

Any person required to make a report under this subchapter who willfully fails to make such a report shall be subject to a civil fine of $300.

(b)

Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be handled by the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to § 2-1831.03(b-6).

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 254
as added June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-315, § 4, 60 DCR 1702
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-315 added this section.